California statutes. Fish and Game Code
Not more than the prescribed daily bag limit may be possessed by any person during one day, except that a market or restaurant, where clams are sold to the public, may possess any number of Washington clams and gapers legally taken.

In Districts 8 and 9 the holder of a commercial fishing license who has in his possession a current daily written order for clams issued by a fish dealer or restaurant may possess any number of Washington clams and gapers legally taken up to but not exceeding the number specified in the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8343.

No northern razor clams (Siliqua patula) may be sold; but if taken outside the State and brought within the State, they may be possessed, transported, and sold without restriction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8344.

Mussels (Mytilus californianus) may be taken only in accordance with such regulations as the commission may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

8345.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or purchase any rock scallops (Hinnites multirugosus) or scallops (Pecten circularis), except that scallops cultivated pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000) which may be sold or purchased subject to regulations of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

8346.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or purchase any pismo clams taken in this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Salt-water and Anadromous Fish Generally [8370. - 8403.]

8370.

(a) Any striped bass, salmon, or sturgeon, if alive, that is taken in any type of net in any district shall be immediately liberated from the net by the fishermen and immediately returned to the water without further harm.

(b) Any striped bass, salmon, or sturgeon that is taken in any type of nets in any district shall be removed from the net by the fisherman and immediately returned to the water, regardless of the condition of the fish.

(c) The holder of a commercial fishing license shall not have in his or her possession, except when releasing fish from the net, any striped bass, salmon, or sturgeon, whether dead or alive, at any time when conducting netting operations or when going to or from those operations.

(d) Fish returned to the water in accordance with this section is not deterioration, waste, or spoilage of fish for purposes of Section 7704.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 677, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8371.

Striped bass and salmon may be sold or offered for sale only under the following conditions:

(a) If the striped bass is taken or possessed by, and is the cultured progeny of, an aquaculturist who is registered under Section 15101, that striped bass may be sold or purchased subject to regulations of the commission.

(b) If the striped bass is taken legally in another state that permits the sale of that fish and if the fish is lawfully imported under Section 2363, the striped bass may be possessed, sold, or purchased.

(c) If the salmon is taken legally in another state that permits
 the sale of salmon, and is lawfully imported consistent with Section 2361, the salmon may be possessed, sold, or purchased.

(d) If the salmon is taken in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 8210.2), the salmon may be possessed, sold, or purchased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 92.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8372.

Kelp bass, sand bass, or spotted bass, all of the genus Paralabrax, shall not be sold or purchased, or possessed in any place where fish are purchased, possessed for sale, or sold, or where food is offered or processed for sale, or in any truck, vessel, or other conveyance operated by or for a place so selling or possessing fish; except that those fish may be imported into this state pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 2345) of Chapter 4 of Division 3, and may be sold under regulations as the commission may adopt. It is unlawful to take, possess, or sell any fish less than 1012 inches in length of the species specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 121.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8373.

No yellowfin croaker, spotfin croaker, or California corbina may be sold or purchased, or possessed in any place where fish are purchased, possessed for sale, or sold, or where food is offered for sale, or in any truck or other conveyance operated by or for a place so selling or possessing fish.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1403, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

8374.

Yellowfin tuna and bluefin tuna may be taken at any time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8375.

No bluefin tuna weighing less than 712 pounds may be sold, purchased, or processed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 850.)
-------------------------------------------

8376.

Albacore may be taken at any time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8377.

(a) Pacific bonito less than 24 inches fork length or five pounds in weight shall not be taken or possessed on any vessel at any time for any commercial purpose, except as follows:

(1) A load of bonito taken on a vessel by the use of round haul nets may contain 18 percent or less by number of bonito smaller than the minimum size.

(2) A load of fish taken on a vessel by the use of gill nets or trammel nets may contain 1,000 pounds or less of bonito smaller than the minimum size per trip.

(b) Pacific bonito smaller than the minimum size, incidentally taken, may be used for any purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 269, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

8377.5.

Pacific bonito shall be measured from the tip of the lower jaw to the center of the fork of the tail fin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 269, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8378.

Skipjack may be taken at any time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8380.

(a) Giant seabass (Stereolepis gigas) may not be taken for any purpose, except that not more than one fish per vessel may be possessed or sold if taken incidentally in commercial fishing operations by gill or trammel net. Any fish so taken shall not be transferred to any other vessel.

(b) The restrictions specified in this section shall not apply to 1,000 pounds of giant seabass per trip taken in waters lying south of the International Boundary Line between the United States and Mexico extended westerly into the Pacific Ocean. Fish taken under this provision, however, shall be limited to a maximum aggregate of 3,000 pounds per vessel in any calendar year. A current fishing permit issued by the Mexican government constitutes valid evidence that the giant seabass were taken south of the international boundary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 308, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8381.

It is unlawful to take grunion (Leuresthes tenuis) except between June 1st and March 31st.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8382.

Barracuda and yellowtail not less than 28 inches in length may be taken with hook and line at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1370, Sec. 22.   Effective October 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

8383.5.

It is unlawful to take, possess, sell, or purchase any white sea bass less than 28 inches in length, measured from the tip of the lower jaw to the end of the longer lobe of the tail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1370, Sec. 24.   Effective October 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

8384.

No barracuda or yellowtail less than 28 inches in length may be sold or purchased, except that not more than five barracuda and five yellowtail per day may be possessed by the holder of a commercial fishing license for noncommercial use if taken incidentally in commercial fishing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1370, Sec. 25.   Effective October 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

8385.

No person holding a commercial fishing license while on any barge or boat which for hire carries any sport fisherman may take or have in his possession in any one day more than the aggregate number of the following kinds of fish permitted in the case of sport fishing: bluefin tuna, yellowfin tuna, skipjack, yellowtail, marlin, broadbill swordfish, black seabass, albacore, barracuda, white seabass, bonito, rock bass, kelp bass, California halibut, California corbina, yellowfin croaker, and spotfin croaker.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8386.

Barracuda and yellowtail shall be measured from the tip of the lower jaw to the end of the longer lobe of the tail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1370, Sec. 26.   Effective October 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

8387.

From May 1st to August 31st, inclusive, all of the following are unlawful:

(a) For any one person to have in his or her possession on any boat, barge, or other vessel more than 500 pounds of yellowtail.

(b) For any two or more persons to have in their possession on any boat, barge, or other vessel a combined weight of more than 500 pounds of yellowtail per person.

(c) For any five or more persons to have in their possession on any boat, barge, or other vessel a combined weight of more than 2,500 pounds of yellowtail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 573, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8388.

(a) No female angel shark measuring less than 42 inches in total length or 1514 inches in alternate length and no male angel shark measuring less than 40 inches in total length or 1412 inches in alternate length may be possessed, sold, or purchased, except that 10 percent of the angel sharks in any load may measure not more than 12 inch less than the minimum sizes specified herein. 

(b) Angel shark total length shall be measured from the anterior end of the head to the tip of the tail while the fish is lying in a position of natural repose. When measuring total length or alternate length, the tip of the tail may be laid flat against the surface of the measuring device. Angel shark alternate length shall be measured from the point where the leading edge of the first dorsal fin meets the back to the tip of the tail. Angel sharks may be constrained from lateral movement during measurement by restraining devices approved by the department. 

(c) Angel sharks taken in gill or trammel nets shall be landed (brought ashore) with at least one intact pelvic fin and the tail fin attached. 

(d) Angel sharks taken in gill or trammel nets shall not be transferred to or from another vessel, except that angel sharks may be transferred to or from vessels with a department observer on board. An observer shall observe and make a written record of that transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 873, Sec. 6.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

8388.5.

(a) A person shall not take, possess, sell, or purchase for commercial purposes any leopard shark less than 36 inches in total length.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), leopard sharks less than 36 inches in total length possessed by a person for aquarium display on or before January 1, 1994, may be retained by that person if a letter declaring that the shark was legally obtained prior to January 1, 1994, is provided to the Sacramento office of the department on or before January 1, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1100, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8389.

(a) Herring eggs may only be taken for commercial purposes under a revocable, nontransferable permit subject to such regulations as the commission shall prescribe. In addition to the license fees provided for in this code, every person taking herring eggs under this section shall pay a royalty, as the commission may prescribe, of not less than fifty dollars ($50) per ton of herring eggs taken.

(b) Whenever necessary to prevent overutilization, to ensure efficient and economic operation of the fishery, or to otherwise carry out this article, the commission may limit the number of permits which are issued and the amount of herring eggs taken under those permits.

(c) In limiting the number of permits, the commission shall take into consideration any restriction of the fishing area and the safety of others who, for purposes other than fishing, use the waters from which herring eggs are taken.

(d) Every person operating under a permit issued pursuant to this section is excepted from the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6650) of Part 1 of Division 6 for aquatic plants taken incidental to the harvest of herring eggs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1009, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8391.

California halibut (Paralichthys californicus) may be taken at any time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8392.

No California halibut may be taken, possessed, or sold that measures less than 22 inches in total length. Total length means the shortest distance between the tip of the jaw or snout, whichever extends farthest while the mouth is closed, and the tip of the longest lobe of the tail, measured while the halibut is lying flat in natural repose, without resort to any force other than the swinging or fanning of the tail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

8393.

(a) Except where subdivision (b) has been complied with, marlin meat, whether fresh, smoked, canned, or preserved by any means, shall not be bought or sold, or possessed or transported for the purpose of sale.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of this section, black marlin (Makaira Indica) may be imported into this state for the purpose of processing (manufacturing) a product commonly known as fish cakes for human consumption. All black marlin (Makaira Indica) imported into this state must be in an identifiable condition and accompanied by a bill of lading, showing the name of the consignor, the consignee, and the weight or number of fish shipped. A copy of the
 bill of lading must be delivered to the nearest office of the department either prior to or no later than two days after receipt of the fish. No black marlin (Makaira Indica) imported into California may leave the premises of the original consignee unless written permission is received from the department, or unless processed into the form of the product commonly known as fish cakes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 93.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8394.

Swordfish shall not be taken, possessed aboard a boat, or landed by a person for commercial purposes except under a valid swordfish permit. At least one person aboard the boat shall have a swordfish permit issued to that person that has not been revoked or suspended, subject to regulations adopted by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8394.5.

The fee for the permit issued pursuant to Section 8394 is three hundred thirty dollars ($330). This permit fee does not apply to the holder of a valid drift gill net shark and swordfish permit required under Article 16 (commencing with Section 8561) or to any person who participates in the permit transition program established by the department pursuant to Section 8583.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 844, Sec. 2.   (SB 1017)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8395.

(a) Upon the recommendation of the director regarding management measures for surfperch of the family Embiotocidae, the commission may adopt regulations to manage the commercial surfperch resource and fisheries consistent with Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7050), including, but not limited to, adoption of changes to the prohibitions imposed under subdivision (b).

(b) Except as may be authorized under subdivision (a), surfperch of the family Embiotocidae may be taken only between July 16th and April 30th, except shiner surfperch (Cymatogaster aggregata), which may be taken, sold, or purchased at any time. Surfperch may be sold or purchased only between July 16th and May 10th, except as may be authorized under subdivision (a). South of a line drawn east and west through Point Arguello, barred surfperch, redtail surfperch, and calico surfperch may not be taken for commercial purposes, except as may be authorized under subdivision (a). Surfperch of these three species that have been taken north of the line during the open season and shipped south of the line may be sold or purchased under those regulations that the commission may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 573, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8398.

(a) It is unlawful to take fish for commercial purposes in that portion of Tomales Bay in District 10 between a line drawn from the most northern tip of Tomales Point northeast, 47° magnetic, to the opposite shore in the vicinity of Dillon Beach, and a line drawn west from the western tip of Tom’s Point, 252° magnetic, to the opposite eastern shore of Tomales Point.

(b) This section does not apply to the taking of oysters by a person who has obtained a state water bottom lease pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 15400) of Division 12 for the cultivation of oysters, in their lease site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 156.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8399.

North of Point Conception, squid may be taken the year around; however, the commission may adopt regulations specifying the days of the week and the times of the day when squid may be taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 131, Sec. 16.5.   Effective June 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

8399.1.

(a) In District 10, it is unlawful to engage in the following activities:

(1) Attract squid by a light displayed from any vessel, except a vessel deploying nets for the take, possession, and landing of squid or from the seine skiff of the vessel deploying nets for the take, possession, and landing of squid.

(2) Attract squid by a light displayed from any vessel whose primary purpose is not the deployment, or assisting in the deployment, of nets for the take, possession, and landing of squid.

(3) Encircle any vessel. This paragraph does not apply to a seine skiff of a vessel that is deploying nets
 for the take, possession, and landing of squid, while that vessel is engaged in the taking of squid.

(b) For purposes of this section, “seine skiff” means a vessel that meets all the following requirements:

(1) It is not licensed by the federal government or registered by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2) It is used to assist a larger federally-licensed or state-registered fishing vessel by assisting in the deployment and retrieval of nets and the landing of fish.

(3) It travels with that larger fishing vessel at all times.

(4) It is used solely at the direction of the operator of the larger fishing vessel.

(5) It is
 owned by the owner of the larger fishing vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 157.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8400.

(a) California killifish (Fundulus parvipinnis), mudsuckers (Gillichthys mirabilis), and yellowfin gobies (Acanthogobius flavimanus) may only be taken for commercial purposes with baitfish traps in the tidewaters of Districts 312, 4, 418, 434, 16, 17, and 21, in the tidewaters of District 10 south of the City and County of San Francisco, in the Salton Sea, and in Imperial and Riverside Counties.

(b) Shiner perch (Cymatogaster aggregata), staghorn sculpin (Leptocottus armatus), mudsuckers (Gillichthys mirabilis), and yellowfin gobies (Acanthogobius flavimanus) may only be taken for commercial purposes with baitfish traps in Districts 11, 12, and 13 and in the tidewaters of Districts 2 and 212.

(c) Any unauthorized species taken incidentally in baitfish traps in the districts specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be immediately released. 

(d) Baitfish traps, as described in Section 9020, may be used subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 9000) of Chapter 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1009, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

8403.

(a) To the extent not in conflict with Section 8607, marine species of fin fish that are classified as groundfish may be taken under the regulations of the commission.

(b) Marine species of fin fish, including, but not limited to, fin fish that are classified as groundfish, may be taken with fin fish traps, subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 9000) of Chapter 4, under regulations of the commission. The regulations may limit the number of fin fish traps that any vessel may use, designate the areas in which the traps may be used, and prescribe other limitations on the use of fin fish traps.

(c) Except as otherwise prohibited, any species may be taken in a
 fin fish trap.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 158.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.1. Sea Cucumbers [8405. - 8405.4.]

8405.

(a) Sea cucumbers shall not be taken, possessed aboard a boat, or landed by a person for commercial purposes except under a valid sea cucumber permit issued to that person, which has not been suspended or revoked.

(b) When taking sea cucumbers by diving, every diver shall have a sea cucumber diving permit issued to that person, which has not been suspended or revoked. When taken by means other than diving, at least one person aboard the boat shall have a valid sea cucumber trawl permit issued to that person, which has not been suspended or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 585, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Inoperative April 1, 2030.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 8405.4.)
-------------------------------------------

8405.1.

(a) Applicants for a sea cucumber permit shall specify by gear type, either trawl or dive, the method in which the applicant intends to take sea cucumbers. The gear type of a sea cucumber permit, either trawl or dive, shall not be transferable.

(b) The fee for a sea cucumber permit shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(c) Each permittee shall complete and submit an accurate record of all sea cucumber fishing activities on forms provided by the department.

(d) In order to renew a sea cucumber permit for any permit year, an applicant shall have been issued a sea cucumber permit in the immediately preceding permit year. Applications for renewal of a sea cucumber permit shall be received by the department or, if mailed, postmarked, by April 30 of the permit year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Inoperative April 1, 2030.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 8405.4.)
-------------------------------------------

8405.2.

(a) A valid sea cucumber permit may be transferred by the permittee if the permittee has previously held a valid sea cucumber permit for any four permit years and landed at least 100 pounds of sea cucumbers in each of those permit years, as documented by electronic fish tickets with the name of the permittee shown on the receipts.

(b) A valid sea cucumber permit that has not been suspended or revoked may be transferred only to a person who has a valid commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Section 7852, that has not been suspended or revoked. A sea cucumber permit shall not be transferred to a person who has had a sea cucumber permit suspended or revoked while the
 suspension or revocation is in effect.

(c) An application for transfer of a permit shall be in the form of a notarized letter and shall be submitted to the department, with reasonable proof as the department may require to establish the qualifications of the permitholder and the person the permit is to be transferred to, accompanied by payment to the department of a nonrefundable transfer fee of two hundred dollars ($200). The transfer shall take effect on the date notice of approval of the application is given to the transferee by the department. The sea cucumber permit shall be valid for the remainder of the permit year and may be renewed in subsequent years.

(d) A sea cucumber trawl permit may be transferred to a qualified person as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) to take
 sea cucumbers by diving or by use of trawl nets. A sea cucumber dive permit may be transferred to a qualified person as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) only to take sea cucumbers by diving. The transferee shall specify the gear type, either trawl or dive, that the transferee intends to use to take sea cucumbers. The gear type of the sea cucumber permit, either trawl or dive, shall not be transferable.

(e) (1) Upon the death of a sea cucumber permitholder, the deceased person’s sea cucumber dive or trawl permit may be transferred by their heirs, assignees, or estate to a qualified person as provided in subdivision (b), upon payment of the fee described in subdivision (c), and in accordance with
 subdivisions (a) and (d). The estate of the decedent may transfer the permit pursuant to this chapter no later than two years from the date of death of the permitholder, as listed on the death certificate.

(2) For purposes of a transfer under this subdivision, the heirs, assignees, or estate shall renew the permit as specified in Section 8405.1 to keep the permit valid until transferred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 15.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative April 1, 2030.    Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 8405.4.)
-------------------------------------------

8405.3.

(a) The commission, upon recommendation of the department or upon its own motion and in consultation with the sea cucumber fishing industry, may adopt regulations, including provisions governing seasons, gear restrictions, hours of operation, and any other measures that it determines may reasonably be necessary to protect the sea cucumber resource and to assure a sustainable sea cucumber fishery or to enhance enforcement activities.

(b) The number of sea cucumber permits issued for the April 1, 1997, to March 31, 1998, inclusive, permit year shall constitute the maximum number of permits available for all subsequent permit years for the sea cucumber fishery. The department may establish by regulation a method, if necessary, to reissue any sea cucumber permit not renewed or transferred. The permit type of a sea cucumber permit, either trawl or dive, that is reissued shall not be transferable.

(c) The commission may permanently revoke the sea cucumber permit of any person convicted of the unlawful taking of any California halibut while operating pursuant to a sea cucumber permit. The commission may revoke the sea cucumber permit of any person convicted of any other violation of this code or regulation adopted pursuant thereto while operating pursuant to a sea cucumber permit. Any revocation of a permit pursuant to this subdivision shall be in addition to any action the department may take pursuant to Section 12000.

(d) Subsequent to the 1997–98 permit year, the department, using existing funds, may determine the actual costs to the department of enforcing this article. The commission, upon recommendation of the department, may adjust the fee for the issuance or transfer of a permit to an amount not to exceed three hundred fifty dollars ($350), to reflect the actual cost of enforcing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 585, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Inoperative April 1, 2030.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 8405.4.)
-------------------------------------------

8405.4.

This article shall become inoperative on April 1, 2030, and as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 29.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Inoperative April 1, 2030.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Termination clause affects Article 9.1, commencing with Section 8405.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Pacific Mackerel [8411. - 8412.]

8411.

The department shall manage the Pacific mackerel resource in conformance with the federal fishery regulations as recommended by the Pacific Fishery Management Council and as adopted by the Secretary of Commerce.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8412.

Pacific mackerel may be taken under a revocable nontransferable permit issued by the department to boat owners or operators under conditions prescribed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.7. Market Squid [8420. - 8429.7.]

8420.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the fishery for market squid (Loligo opalescens) is the state’s largest fishery by volume, generating millions of dollars of income to the state annually from domestic and foreign sales. In addition to supporting an important commercial fishery, the market squid resource is important to the recreational fishery and is forage for other fish taken for commercial and recreational purposes, as well as for marine mammals, birds, and other marine life. The growing international market for squid and declining squid production from other parts of the world has resulted in an increased demand for California market squid, which, in turn, has led to newer, larger, and more efficient vessels entering the fishery and increased processing capacity.

(b) The Legislature finds that the lack of research on market squid and the lack of annual at-sea surveys to determine the status of the resource, combined with the increased demand for, and fishing effort on, market squid could result in overfishing of the resource, damaging the resource, and financially harming those persons engaged in the taking, landing, processing, and sale of market squid.

(c) The Legislature further finds that some individuals, vessels, and processing plants engaged in the market squid fishery have no other viable alternative fisheries available to them and that a decline or a loss of the market squid resource would cause economic devastation to the individuals or corporations engaged in the market squid fishery.

(d) The Legislature declares that to prevent excessive fishing effort in the market squid fishery and to develop a plan for the sustainable harvest of market squid, it is necessary to adopt and implement a fishery management plan for the California market squid fishery that sustains both the squid population and the marine life that depends on squid.

(e) The Legislature finds that a sustainable California market squid fishery can best be ensured through ongoing oversight and management of the fishery by the commission. With regard to the market squid fishery, the Legislature urges that any limited entry component of a fishery management plan, if necessary, should be adopted for the primary purpose of protecting the resource and not simply for the purpose of diminishing or advancing the economic interests of any particular individual or group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 318, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8424.

(a) No person shall purchase squid from a vessel or vessels unless that person holds a license issued pursuant to Section 8032 or 8033, employs a certified weighmaster, and the facilities operated by the person are located on a permanent, fixed location.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall not apply to the transfer at sea of squid for live bait in an amount less than 200 pounds in a calendar day.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 785, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8425.

(a) On or before December 31, 2002, the commission, after consideration of the report and recommendations prepared by the department pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8426, and, after public hearings, shall adopt a market squid fishery management plan and regulations to protect the squid resource and manage the squid fishery at a level that sustains healthy squid populations, taking into account the level of fishing effort and ecological factors, including, but not limited to, the species’ role in the marine ecosystem and oceanic conditions. The management plan shall be consistent with the requirements of Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7050). Development of the plan shall be coordinated with the federal Coastal Pelagic Species Fishery Management Plan.

(b) On and after January 1, 2002, the commission shall manage the squid fishery in accordance with the requirements of Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 318, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8428.

Commencing April 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, the fees for a commercial market squid vessel permit and for a commercial squid light boat owner’s permit shall be established by the commission. The total amount of fees collected pursuant to this section, including any revenue derived from any other appropriate source, as determined and allocated by the commission, shall not exceed the department’s and the commission’s costs for managing the market squid fishery pursuant to Section 8425. The fees collected pursuant to this article shall be used only for the management of the market squid fishery pursuant to Section 8425.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 318, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8429.

(a) Any statement made to the department, orally or in writing, relating to a permit issued under this article, shall be made under penalty of perjury.

(b) The commission shall revoke the commercial fishing license, the commercial boat registration of any vessel, and, if applicable, any licenses issued pursuant to Section 8032, 8033, or 8034 that are held by any person submitting material false statements, as determined by the commission, for the purpose of obtaining a commercial market squid vessel permit or a commercial squid light boat owner’s permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 159.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8429.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing in this article shall prohibit or otherwise limit the authority of the director or the commission under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 785, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8429.7.

Sections 8420.5 to 8423.5, inclusive, and Sections 8426 and 8427 shall become inoperative upon the adoption by the commission of a market squid fishery management plan and the adoption of implementing regulations pursuant to Section 8425, and are repealed six months thereafter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 318, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Note: Termination clause affected Sections 8420.5, 8421, 8421.5, 8422, 8423, 8423.5, 8426, and 8427.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Fresh-water Fish Generally [8430. - 8438.]

8430.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, it is unlawful to sell or purchase any species of trout.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8431.

Dolly Varden or steelhead trout from without the State may be possessed and sold within the State when they are inspected and tagged in accordance with regulations prescribed by the commission. The cost of such inspection and tagging shall be paid by the person submitting the trout for such inspection and tagging.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8432.

Steelhead trout from without the State may not be sold or possessed in District 112 in excess of the daily bag limit on steelhead trout for that district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8433.

Nothing in this article applies to trout grown pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

8434.

It is unlawful to sell or purchase any fresh, canned, or cured fish taken in the Klamath River District or in the waters of the Smith River.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8435.

No catfish may be sold, except catfish imported from without the state or catfish grown pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

8436.

Except as provided in Section 8436.5, fish of the family Centrarchidae (Sacramento perch, crappie, black bass, and sunfish) shall not be taken or possessed for commercial purposes, sold, or purchased, other than fish that are cultured pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 328, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8436.5.

Notwithstanding Section 8436, the commission shall adopt regulations which authorize the importation and sale of dead fish of the family Centrarchidae if the fish have been lawfully taken outside of California, they have been taken in another state or foreign country that permits their sale, and they are brought into California with a bill of lading or similar accountable documentation specifying the origin of the fish.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 763, Sec. 5.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

8437.

The following freshwater fish may be taken for commercial purposes pursuant to regulations adopted by the commission:

(a) Threadfin shad (Dorosoma petenense).

(b) Species of the following families:

(1) Lamprey (Petromyzontidae).

(2) Smelt (Osmeridae).

(3) Sucker (Catostomidae).

(4) Carp or minnow (Cyprinidae).

(5) Killifish (Cyprinodontidae).

(6) Livebearer (Peociliidae).

(7) Silverside (Antherinidae).

(8) Cichlid (Cichlidae).

(9) Mullet (Mudilidae).

(10) Sculpin (Cottidae).

(11) Stickleback (Casterosteidae).

(12) Goby (Gobiidae).

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 271, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8437.1.

The commission may authorize the use of commercial fishing gear and fishing methods to take any fish listed in Section 8437 in those areas of the state otherwise closed to that use pursuant to this code.
